District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-617

License to confer degrees — Revocation of license; notice; hearing before Commission; review.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 586d
Mar. 2, 1929, 45 Stat. 1504, ch. 523
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
Nov. 7, 1966, 80 Stat. 1430, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 106
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 163(a)
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 6(a)(3), 23 DCR 8734
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4004(b)(3), 52 DCR 7503
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-617.
1981 Ed., § 29-817.
1973 Ed., § 29-417.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4004(b)(3) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Editor's Notes

Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1988 changed the name of the Commission from the Educational Institution Licensure Commission to the Education Licensure Commission.